Hawaii statutes.
§340E-6 Notification of users and
department. (a) Whenever a public water system:

(1) Fails to comply with an applicable maximum
contaminant level, treatment technique, or testing procedure requirement of a
state primary drinking water regulation;

(2) Fails to perform monitoring required by
regulations adopted by the director;

(3) Is subject to a variance granted for an inability
to meet a maximum contaminant level requirement;

(4) Is subject to an exemption; or

(5) Fails to comply with the requirements of any
schedule prescribed by such a variance or exemption;

the public water system shall promptly notify the
department, and in the case of a violation under [paragraph (1)], the local
communications media, of the conditions and the extent to which they may impose
adverse effects on public health and the corrective action being taken when
appropriate.

(b) Notice of any violation determined by the
director as posing a serious adverse health effect as a result of short term
exposure shall be given as soon as practicable, but not later than twenty-four
hours after the violation.

(c) The director shall prescribe by rules the
form, content, and manner for giving notice. The rules may contain such
additional public notification requirements as the director determines are
necessary to best effectuate the purpose of this chapter, including consumer
confidence reports, and may also contain alternative notice requirements as
allowed by the Federal Act. [L 1976, c 84, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 66, §2; am L
1984, c 268, §2; am L 1987, c 165, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 218, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next